District of Columbia statutes.
8-1812

Civil liability.

If a dog injures a person while at large, lack of knowledge of the dog’s vicious propensity standing alone shall not absolve the owner from a finding of negligence.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-97, § 2(f), 27 DCR 3523

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1012.

Prior Codifications